District of Columbia statutes.
6-501

Review of building permit applications; design and construction requirements.

The Mayor shall review all building permit applications for new construction or substantial improvements to determine whether proposed building sites will be reasonably safe from flooding. If a proposed building site is in a location that has flood hazard, the proposed new construction or substantial improvement (including prefabricated homes) must:

(1)

Be designed (or modified) and anchored to prevent flotation, collapse, or lateral movement of the structure;

(2)

Use construction materials and utility equipment that are resistant to flood damage; and

(3)

Use construction methods and practices that will minimize flood damage.

History

May 26, 1976, D.C. Law 1-64, § 2, 22 DCR 7146

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-301.
1973 Ed., § 5-1101.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 1-64, the “D.C. Applications Insurance Implementation Act”, see Mayor’s Order 98-46, April 15, 1998 ( 45 DCR 2691).

Mayor's Orders

Authority under District of Columbia Applications Insurance Implementation Act delegated: See Mayor’s Order 84-193, November 2, 1984.